en: Ground dried green peppers
es: Pimienta verde seca en polvo
fr: Poivre vert déshydraté moulu
hr: Mljevene suhe zelene paprike
nl: Gevriesdroogde gemalen groene peper

en: Pink peppers
ar: حب فلفل زهري
az: Çəhrayı istiot
bg: Розов пипер
ca: Pebre fals
cs: Pepř růžový
da: Rosépeber
de: Rosa Pfeffer
es: Pimienta rosa
fa: فلفل صورتی
fi: Perunroseepippuri
fr: Poivres roses, Poivre rose
hr: Ružičaste paprike
ht: Bè woz
it: Pepe rosa
ja: 赤胡椒, 赤コショウ, 赤こしょう, ピンクペッパー
ko: 핑크페퍼
la: Granum piperis roseum
lt: Rausvieji pipirai
ml: പിങ്ക് പെപ്പർകോൺ
nl: Roze pepers
ru: Розовый перец
sl: Rožnati poper
sv: Rosépeppar
uk: Рожевий перець

en: Pink peppercorns
da: Rosépeberkorn
de: Rosa Pfefferkörner
es: Pimienta rosa en grano
fr: Poivres roses en grains
nl: Roze peperkorrels
sv: Rosépepparkorn

en: Dried pink peppercorns
da: Tørrede rosépeberkorn
es: Pimienta rosa en grano seca
fr: Poivres roses déshydraté en grains
nl: Gedroogde roze peperkorrels
sv: Torkade rosépepparkorn

en: Fresh pink peppercorns
da: Friske rosépeberkorn
es: Pimienta rosa en grano fresca
fr: Poivres roses fraîche en grains
nl: Verse roze peperkorrels
sv: Färska rosépepparkorn

en: White peppers
bg: Бял пипер
de: Weißer Pfeffer
es: Pimienta blanca
fi: valkopippurit
fr: Poivres blancs
hr: Bijele paprike
ja: 白胡椒, 白コショウ, 白こしょう, ホワイトペッパー
lt: Baltieji pipirai
nl: Witte pepers
pl: Pieprz biały

en: White peppercorns
de: Weiße Pfefferkörner
es: Pimienta blanca en grano
fr: Poivre blanc en grains
hr: Bijeli papar u zrnu
lt: Baltieji pipirų žirneliai
nl: Witte peperkorrels

en: Ground white peppers, White pepper powder
de: Weißer Pfeffer gemahlen
es: Pimienta blanca en polvo
fr: Poivre blanc moulu, Poivre blanc en poudre
hr: Mljevene bijele paprike
lt: Malti baltieji pipirai
nl: Gemalen witte pepers

en: Saffron
bg: Шафран
de: Safran
es: Azafrán
fi: Sahrami
fr: Safran
hr: Šafran
ja: サフラン
la: Crocus sativus
lt: Šafranas
nl: Saffraan
pl: Szafran

en: Powdered saffron
bg: Шафран на прах
es: Azafrán en polvo
fr: Safran en poudre
hr: Šafran u prahu
lt: Maltas šafranas
nl: Saffraanpoeders
pl: Szafran w proszku

en: Saffron threads
de: Safranfäden
es: Azafrán en hebras
fr: Safran pistils
hr: Niti šafrana
lt: Šafrano siūlai
nl: Hele Saffraan
pl: Szafran w nitkach

en: Spanish spices
lt: Ispaniški prieskoniai

en: Star anise, Star anise seed, Chinese star anise
bg: Звездовиден анасон
de: Sternanis
es: Anís estrellado
fr: Étoiles de badiane, Badiane chinoise, Anis étoilé
hr: Zvjezdani anis
la: Illicium verum
lt: Žvaigždinis anyžius
nl: Steranijsthee
pl: Anyż gwiaździsty, Anyż gwiazdkowy

en: Sumac, Sumach, Sumak, Soumak, Sumaq
bg: Сумак
de: Sumach, Sumak, Rhus
es: Sumac, Rhus, Zumaque
fr: Sumac, Rhus
hr: Ruj
it: Sommaco
lt: Žagrenis
nl: Sumak
pl: Sumak
pt: Sumagre

en: Sicilian sumac, Rhus coriara, Tanner's sumach
de: Gerber-Sumach, Rhus coriara
es: Rhus coriara
fr: Rhus coriaria, Sumac des corroyeurs
hr: Sicilijanski ruj
it: Sommacco siciliano
la: Rhus coriara
pt: Rhus coriara

en: Turmeric
bg: Куркума
de: Kurkuma, Curcuma
es: Cúrcuma
fi: kurkuma
fr: Curcuma
hr: Kurkuma
it: Curcuma
ja: ターメリック
la: Curcuma longa
lt: Ciberžolė
nl: Kurkuma, Geelwortel, Koenjit

en: Turmeric powder
bg: Куркума на прах
de: Kurkuma Pulver
es: Cúrcuma molida, Cúrcuma en polvo
fi: kurkumajauhe
fr: Curcuma en poudre, Poudre de curcuma, Curcuma moulu
hr: Kurkuma u prahu
it: Polvere di curcuma
lt: Malta ciberžolė
nl: Kurkumapoeders, Geelwortelpoeders, Koenjitpoeders

en: Turmeric rhizomes
es: Rizomas de cúrcuma
fr: Rhizomes de curcuma
hr: Rizomi kurkume
lt: Ciberžolės šakniastiebiai
nl: Kurkumawortels

en: Vanilla
bg: Ванилия
de: Vanille
es: Vainilla
fi: vanilja
fr: Vanille
hr: Vanilija
it: Vaniglia
ja: バニラ
la: Vanilla
lt: Vanilė
nl: Vanille
tr: Vanilya

en: Vanilla powder
bg: Ванилия на прах
es: Vainilla en polvo
fr: Vanille en poudre
hr: Prah vanilije
lt: Malta vanilė
nl: Vanillepoeder
tr: Vanilya tozu